Colorado, session 2026A, HB1287.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-10-227 as
follows:
12-10-227. Repeal of part - subject to review.
This part 2 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026 SEPTEMBER 1,
2037. Before the repeal, the division, including the commission, is
scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-10-305 as
follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

12-10-305. Repeal of part - subject to review.
This part 3 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026 SEPTEMBER 1,
2037. Before the repeal, this part 3 is scheduled for review in accordance
with section 24-34-104.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-10-508 as
follows:
12-10-508. Repeal of part - subject to review.
This part 5 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026 SEPTEMBER 1,
2037. Before the repeal, this part 5 is scheduled for review in accordance
with section 24-34-104.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 12-10-906 as
follows:
12-10-906. Repeal of part - subject to review.
This part 9 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026. Before the
repeal, this part 9 is scheduled for review in accordance with section
24-34-104.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
(27)(a)(VI) and (27)(a)(XVII); and add (38)(a)(VII) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(VI) The division of real estate, including the real estate
commission, created in part 2 of article 10 of title 12, and its functions
under parts 2, 3, and 5 of article 10 of title 12;
(XVII) The legal requirements pertaining to home warranty service
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

contracts under part 9 of article 10 of title 12.
(38) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2037:
(VII) THE DIVISION OF REAL ESTATE, INCLUDING THE REAL ESTATE
COMMISSION, CREATED IN PART 2 OF ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 12, AND ITS
FUNCTIONS UNDER PARTS 2, 3, AND 5 OF ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 12.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-10-202 as
follows:
12-10-202. License required.
(1) It is unlawful for any A person, A firm, A partnership, A limited
liability company, AN association, or A corporation to engage in the business
or capacity of real estate broker in this state without first having obtained
a license from the commission. No THE COMMISSION SHALL NOT GRANT A
person shall be granted a license until the person establishes compliance
with the provisions of this part 2 concerning education, experience, and
testing; truthfulness and honesty and otherwise good moral character; and,
in addition to any other requirements of this section, competency to transact
the business of a real estate broker in such A manner as to safeguard the
interest of the public and only after satisfactory proof of the qualifications,
together with the application for the license, is filed in the office of the
commission. In determining the person's character, the commission shall be
governed by section 24-5-101.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY DENY A LICENSE TO AN APPLICANT FOR
LICENSURE IF THE APPLICANT IS GUILTY OF ANY OF THE OFFENSES LISTED IN
SECTION 12-10-217 (1)(n)(I).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-217, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(b), (1)(h), (1)(i), (7), and (9) as follows:
12-10-217. Investigation - revocation - actions against licensee
or applicant - definition.
(1) The commission, upon its own motion, may, and, upon the
complaint in writing of any person, shall, investigate the activities of any
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

licensee or any person who THAT assumes to act in the capacity of a licensee
within the state, and the commission, after holding a hearing pursuant to
section 12-10-219, has the power to MAY impose an administrative fine not
to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for each separate offense, and
to censure a licensee, to place the A licensee on probation and to set the
terms of probation, or to temporarily suspend a license or permanently
revoke a license when IF the licensee has performed, is performing, or is
attempting to perform any of the following acts and is guilty of:
(b) Making any promise of a character that influences, persuades,
or induces another person when he or she THE LICENSEE could not or did not
intend to keep the promise;
(h) Failing to account for or to remit, within a reasonable time, any
money coming into the licensee's possession that belongs to others whether
acting as real estate brokers or otherwise WHEN PERFORMING FUNCTIONS
FOR WHICH A LICENSE IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-10-201 (6),
and failing to keep records relative to the money, which records shall MUST
contain such information as may be IS prescribed by the rules of the
commission relative thereto and shall be ARE subject to audit by the
commission;
(i) WHEN PERFORMING FUNCTIONS FOR WHICH A LICENSE IS
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-10-201 (6), converting funds of others,
diverting funds of others without proper authorization, commingling funds
of others with the broker's own funds, or failing to keep the funds of others
in an escrow or a trustee account with some bank or recognized depository
in this state, which account may be any type of checking, demand,
passbook, or statement account insured by an agency of the United States
government, and to keep records relative to the deposit that contain such
information as may be prescribed by the rules of the commission, relative
thereto, which records shall be ARE subject to audit by the commission;
(7) When a complaint or an investigation discloses an instance of
misconduct that, in the opinion of the commission, does not warrant formal
action by the commission but that should not be dismissed as being without
merit, the commission may send a letter of admonition by ELECTRONIC MAIL
OR BY certified mail, return receipt requested, to the licensee against whom
a complaint was made and a copy thereof to the person making the
complaint. but The letter shall MUST advise the licensee that the licensee has
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

the right to request, in writing, within twenty days after proven receipt, that
formal disciplinary proceedings be initiated to adjudicate the propriety of
the conduct upon which the letter of admonition is based. If the request is
timely made, the letter of admonition shall be deemed vacated, and the
matter shall be processed by means of formal disciplinary proceedings.
(9) Any application for licensure from a person whose license has
been revoked shall not be considered until the passage of one year TWO
YEARS from the date of revocation.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-213, amend (5);
and add (6) and (7) as follows:
12-10-213. Renewal of license - continuing education
requirement - rules.
(5) The commission shall promulgate rules to implement this section
MAY INACTIVATE THE LICENSE OF A LICENSEE WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(6) THE DIVISION MAY CHARGE A FEE TO EACH PROVIDER THAT
SUBMITS A CONTINUING EDUCATION COURSE.
(7) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT RULES TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-203, amend
(5)(b) and (8) as follows:
12-10-203. Application for license - rules - definition.
(5) (b) An applicant for a broker's license who has held a real estate
license in another jurisdiction that administers a real estate broker's
examination and who has been licensed for two or more years prior to
applying for a Colorado license may be issued a broker's license if the
applicant establishes that he or she possesses THEY POSSESS credentials and
qualifications that are substantively equivalent to the requirements in
Colorado for licensure by examination.
(8) No A license for a broker registered as being in the employ of
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

another broker shall NOT be issued to a partnership, a limited liability
company, or a corporation or under a fictitious name or trade name; except
that a married woman AN INDIVIDUAL may elect to use her birth A
PREVIOUSLY USED LEGAL name.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-10-224 as
follows:
12-10-224. Subpoena compelling attendance of witnesses and
production of records and documents.
The commission, the director, or the administrative law judge
appointed for hearings may issue a subpoena compelling the attendance and
testimony of witnesses and the production of books, papers, or records
pursuant to an investigation or hearing of the commission. The subpoenas
shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas issued by district courts
MAY BE ENFORCED BY A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION IF NOT OBEYED
and shall be issued without discrimination between public or private parties
requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents at
hearings. If a person fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the
commission, the director, or the appointed administrative law judge, the
commission may petition the district court having jurisdiction for issuance
of a subpoena in the premises, and the court shall, in a proper case, issue its
subpoena. Any A person who THAT refuses to obey a subpoena shall be
punished as provided in section 12-10-225.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-506, amend (4)
as follows:
12-10-506. Powers of commission - injunction - rules.
(4) The commission, the director, or the administrative law judge
appointed for a hearing may issue a subpoena compelling the attendance
and testimony of witnesses and the production of books, papers, or records
pursuant to an investigation or hearing of the commission. Any such
subpoena shall be served in the same manner as for subpoenas issued by
district courts MAY BE ENFORCED BY A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION
IF NOT OBEYED.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-207, amend (2)
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

as follows:
12-10-207. Division of real estate - creation - director, clerks,
and assistants.
(2) It is the duty of the director, personally, or the director's designee
to:
(a) Aid in the administration and enforcement of parts 2 THIS PART
2 and PART 5 of this article 10 and in the prosecution of all persons charged
with violating any of their provisions; to
(b) Conduct audits of business accounts of licensees; to
(c) ESTABLISH PROTOCOLS TO ADDRESS THE SECURITY OF
ELECTRONIC CORRESPONDENCE, INCLUDING WHEN ELECTRONIC
CORRESPONDENCE MAY BE USED FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 10;
(d) Perform such duties of the commission as the commission
prescribes; and to
(e) Act in ON behalf of the commission on such occasions and in
such circumstances as the commission directs.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-208, amend (2)
as follows:
12-10-208. Resident licensee - nonresident licensee - consent to
service.
(2) If a broker has no registered agent registered in this state, the
registered agent is not located under its registered agent name at its
registered agent address, or the registered agent cannot with reasonable
diligence be served, the broker may be served by ELECTRONIC MAIL,
registered mail, or by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to
the entity at its principal address. Service is perfected under this subsection
(2) at the earliest of:
(a) The date the broker receives the process, notice, or demand;
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

(b) The date shown on the return receipt, if ANY, IF THE RETURN
RECEIPT IS signed by or on behalf of the broker; or
(c) Five days after mailing THE SERVICE IS SENT.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-219, amend (2)
as follows:
12-10-219. Hearing - administrative law judge - review - rules.
(2) The proceedings shall be held in the county where the
commission has its office or in such other place as the commission may
designate. If the licensee is an employed broker, the commission shall also
notify the broker employing the licensee by mailing, by ELECTRONIC MAIL
OR first-class mail, a copy of the written notice required under section
24-4-104 (3) to the employing broker's last-known business address.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-201, amend
(6)(b)(II), (6)(b)(V), (6)(b)(XII), and (6)(b)(XIII) as follows:
12-10-201. Definitions.
As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6) (b) "Real estate broker" or "broker" does not apply to any of the
following:
(II) Any public official in the conduct of his or her THE PUBLIC
OFFICIAL'S official duties;
(V) An attorney-at-law in connection with his or her THE
ATTORNEY'S representation of clients in the practice of law;
(XII) A regularly salaried employee of an owner of an apartment
building or complex who acts as an on-site manager of such an apartment
building or complex. This exemption applies only in WITH respect to the
customary duties of an on-site manager performed for his or her THE
ON-SITE MANAGER'S employer.
(XIII) A regularly salaried employee of an owner of condominium
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

units who acts as an on-site manager of such THE units. For purposes of AS
USED IN this subsection (6)(b)(XIII) only, the term "owner" includes a
homeowners' association AN HOA formed and acting pursuant to its
recorded condominium declaration and bylaws. This exemption applies only
in WITH respect to the customary duties of an on-site manager performed for
his or her THE ON-SITE MANAGER'S employer.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-212, amend (3)
as follows:
12-10-212. License fees - partnership, limited liability company,
and corporation licenses - rules.
(3) Each real estate broker's license granted to an individual shall
entitle ENTITLES the individual to perform all the acts contemplated by this
part 2 without any further application on his or her THE INDIVIDUAL'S part
and without the payment of any fee other than the fees specified in this
section.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-218, amend
(2)(b), (2)(g) introductory portion, and (2)(g)(II) as follows:
12-10-218. Affiliated business arrangements - definitions -
disclosures - enforcement and penalties - reporting - rules -
investigation information shared with the division of insurance.
(2) (b) If a licensee or the employing broker of a licensee is part of
an affiliated business arrangement, when an offer to purchase real property
is fully executed, the licensee shall disclose to all parties to the real estate
transaction the existence of the arrangement THE EXISTENCE OF THE
AFFILIATED BUSINESS ARRANGEMENT TO THE PARTY THE LICENSEE
REPRESENTS AT THE TIME OF MAKING THE REFERRAL. The disclosure shall
be written, shall be signed by all parties to the real estate transaction, and
shall MUST comply with the federal "Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act
of 1974", as amended, 12 U.S.C. sec. 2601 et seq.
(g) It shall IS not be a violation of this section for an affiliated
business arrangement:
(II) If an attorney or law firm represents a client in a real estate
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

transaction and issues or arranges for the issuance of a policy of title
insurance in the transaction directly as agent or through a separate corporate
title insurance agency that may be established by that attorney or law firm
and operated as an adjunct to his or her THE ATTORNEY'S OR LAW FIRM'S law
practice.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-10-225 as
follows:
12-10-225. Failure to obey subpoena - penalty.
Any A person who THAT willfully fails or neglects to appear and
testify or to produce books, papers, or records required by subpoena, duly
served upon him or her THE PERSON in any matter conducted under parts 2
and THIS PART 2 AND PART 5 of this article 10, commits a petty offense.
Each day a person so refuses or neglects constitutes a separate offense.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-10-302 as
follows:
12-10-302. Objections on account of title.
No A real estate agent or broker is NOT entitled to a commission
when a proposed purchaser fails or refuses to complete his or her THE
PROPOSED PURCHASER'S contract of purchase because of defects in the title
of the owner, unless the owner, within a reasonable time, has the defects
corrected by legal proceedings or otherwise.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-10-303 as
follows:
12-10-303. When owner must perfect title.
The AN owner shall IS not be required to begin legal or other
proceedings for the correction of a title until the agent or broker secures
from the proposed purchaser an enforceable contract in writing, binding him
or her THE PROPOSED PURCHASER to complete the purchase whenever the
defects in the title are corrected.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-403, add (9) as
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

follows:
12-10-403. Relationships between brokers and the public -
definition - rules.
(9) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (6)(b) OF THIS SECTION, A
BROKER WORKING WITH A BUYER, SELLER, LANDLORD, OR TENANT MAY
DISCLOSE THE BUYER'S, SELLER'S, LANDLORD'S, OR TENANT'S CONFIDENTIAL
INFORMATION TO THE BROKER'S EMPLOYING BROKER OR TO THE EMPLOYING
BROKER'S DESIGNEE FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROPER SUPERVISION SO LONG AS
THE EMPLOYING BROKER OR DESIGNEE DOES NOT USE THE CONFIDENTIAL
INFORMATION TO THE DETRIMENT OF THE BUYER, SELLER, LANDLORD, OR
TENANT.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-404, amend (2)
introductory portion as follows:
12-10-404. Single agent engaged by seller or landlord.
(2) EXCEPT AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 12-10-403 (9), A BROKER
ACTING AS A SELLER'S OR LANDLORD'S AGENT SHALL NOT DISCLOSE the
following information shall not be disclosed by a broker acting as a seller's
or landlord's agent without the informed EXPRESS WRITTEN consent of the
seller or landlord:
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-405, amend (2)
introductory portion as follows:
12-10-405. Single agent engaged by buyer or tenant.
(2) EXCEPT AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 12-10-403 (9), A BROKER
ACTING AS A BUYER'S OR TENANT'S AGENT SHALL NOT DISCLOSE the
following information shall not be disclosed by a broker acting as a buyer's
or tenant's agent without the informed EXPRESS WRITTEN consent of the
buyer or tenant:
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-407, amend (3)
introductory portion as follows:
12-10-407. Transaction-broker.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

(3) EXCEPT AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 12-10-403 (9), A
TRANSACTION-BROKER SHALL NOT DISCLOSE the following information shall
not be disclosed by a transaction-broker without the informed EXPRESS
WRITTEN consent of all parties:
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-10-505, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(a), and (4) as follows:
12-10-505. Refusal, revocation, or suspension of registration -
letter of admonition - probation.
(1) The commission may impose an administrative fine not to
exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for each separate offense; may
issue a letter of admonition; may place a registrant on probation under its
close supervision on such terms and for such time as it THE COMMISSION
deems appropriate; and may refuse, revoke, or suspend the registration of
any developer or registrant if, after an investigation and after notice and a
hearing pursuant to the provisions of section 24-4-104, the commission
determines that the developer or any director, officer, or stockholder with
controlling interest in the corporation:
(a) Has used false or misleading advertising or has made a false or
misleading statement or a concealment in his or her THE DEVELOPER'S OR
OTHER PERSON'S application for registration;
(4) When a complaint or investigation discloses an instance of
misconduct that, in the opinion of the commission, does not initially warrant
formal action by the commission but that should not be dismissed as being
without merit, the commission may send a letter of admonition by
ELECTRONIC MAIL OR BY certified mail, return receipt requested, to the
registrant who is the subject of the complaint or investigation and a copy
thereof to any person making the complaint. The letter shall MUST advise
the registrant that he or she THE REGISTRANT has the right to request in
writing, within twenty days after proven receipt, that formal disciplinary
proceedings be initiated against him or her THE REGISTRANT to adjudicate
the propriety of the conduct upon which the letter of admonition is based.
If the request is timely made, the letter of admonition shall be deemed
vacated, and the matter shall be processed by means of formal disciplinary
proceedings.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

SECTION 26. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1287

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1287